es: Variedad de batata: Beauregard; Beniharuka (Beni Haruka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; Japonesa (Satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; Morada de Okinawa; Stokes morada; Otra
zh-CN: 红薯品种: 宝丽加; 红遥 (Beniharuka); 卡文顿; 石榴红; 汉娜; 日本红薯 (Satsuma-imo); 宝石; 紫薯; 冲绳紫薯; 斯托克斯紫薯; 其他
hr-HR: Sorta batata: Beauregard; Beniharuka (Beni Haruka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; Japanski (Satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; Okinawan Purple; Stokes Purple; Ostalo
pt-PT: Variedade de batata-doce: Beauregard; Beniharuka (Beni Haruka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; Japonês (satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; Roxa de Okinawa; Stokes Purple; Outra
lt-LT: Batatų veislė: Beauregard; Beniharuka (Beni Haruka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; Japoniški (Satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; Okinawan Purple; Stokes Purple; Kita
tr: Tatlı patates çeşidi: Beauregard; Beniharuka (Beni Haruka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; Japon (Satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; Okinawan moru; Stokes moru; Diğer
nb: Søtpotetvariant: Beauregard; Beniharuka (Beni Haruka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; Japansk (satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; Okinawan purple; Stokes purple; Annet
de: Süßkartoffelsorte: Beauregard; Beniharuka (Beni Haruka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; Japanisch (Satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; Okinawan Purple; Stokes Purple; Sonstige
zh-TW: 地瓜品種: Beauregard; 紅春香 (Beniharuka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; 日本薩摩芋 (Satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; 沖繩紫薯; Stokes 紫薯; 其他
bg-BG: Сорт сладки картофи: Борегард; Бенихарука (Бени Харука); Ковингтън; Гарнет; Хана; Японски (Сацума-имо); Джуел; Мурасаки; Окинавски лилав; Стоукс лилав; Друго
fr: Variété de patate douce: Beauregard; Beniharuka (Beni Haruka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; Japonaise (Satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; Okinawan Purple; Stokes Purple; Autre
cs: Odrůda sladkých brambor: Beauregard; Beniharuka (Beni Haruka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; Japonské (Satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; Okinawské fialové; Stokes Purple; Jiné
ru: Сорт батата: Борегард; Бени Харука; Ковингтон; Гарнет; Ханна; Японский (сацума-имо); Джуэл; Мурасаки; Окинавский пурпурный; Пурпурный Стокс; Другое
hu: Édesburgonya fajtája: Beauregard; Beniharuka (Beni Haruka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; Japán (Satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; Okinawan Purple; Stokes Purple; Egyéb
ja: サツマイモの種類: ボーレガード; べにはるか; コビントン; ガーネット; ハンナ; さつまいも; ジュエル; むらさき; 沖縄紅芋; ストークスパープル; その他
sl-SI: Sorta sladkega krompirja: Beauregard; Beniharuka (Beni Haruka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; Japanese (Satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; Okinawan Purple; Stokes Purple; Drugo
vi: Giống khoai lang: Beauregard; Beniharuka (Beni Haruka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; Nhật Bản (Satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; Tím Okinawa; Tím Stokes; Khác
el: Ποικιλία γλυκοπατάτας: Beauregard; Beniharuka (Beni Haruka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; Ιαπωνική (Satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; Okinawan Purple; Stokes Purple; Άλλο
pl: Odmiana słodkiego ziemniaka: Beauregard; Beniharuka (Beni Haruka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; Japońska (Satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; Okinawan Purple; Stokes Purple; Inna
nl: Zoete aardappel variëteit: Beauregard; Beniharuka (Beni Haruka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; Japans (Satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; Okinawan Purple; Stokes Purple; Overig
it: Varietà di patata dolce: Beauregard; Beniharuka (Beni Haruka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; Giapponese (Satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; Okinawan Purple; Stokes Purple; Altro
da: Sødkartoffelvariant: Beauregard; Beniharuka (Beni Haruka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; Japansk (Satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; Okinawan lilla; Stokes lilla; Andet
th: พันธุ์มันเทศ: บัวร์การ์ด; เบนิฮารุกะ (Beni Haruka); โควิงตัน; การ์เนต; แฮนนาห์; ญี่ปุ่น (ซัตสึมะอิโมะ); จีเวล; มุราซากิ; มันม่วงโอกินาวา; สโตกส์เพอร์เพิล; อื่นๆ
fi: Bataattilajike: Beauregard; Beniharuka (Beni Haruka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; Japanilainen (Satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; Okinawan Purple; Stokes Purple; Muu
ko: 고구마 품종: 뷰리가드; 베니하루카; 커빙턴; 가넷; 해나; 일본(사쓰마이모); 쥬얼; 무라사키; 오키나와 퍼플; 스토크스 퍼플; 기타
en: Sweet potato variety: Beauregard; Beniharuka (Beni Haruka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; Japanese (Satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; Okinawan Purple; Stokes Purple; Other
pt-BR: Batata-doce variedade: Beauregard; Beniharuka (Beni Haruka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; Japonesa (Satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; Okinawan Purple; Stokes Purple; Outra
ro-RO: Soi de cartof dulce: Beauregard; Beniharuka (Beni Haruka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; Japonez (Satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; Okinawan Purple; Stokes Purple; Altele
sk-SK: Odroda sladkých zemiakov: Beauregard; Beniharuka (Beni Haruka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; Japonské (Satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; Okinawan Purple; Stokes Purple; Iná
sv: Sötpotatissort: Beauregard; Beniharuka (Beni haruka); Covington; Garnet; Hannah; Japansk (Satsuma-imo); Jewel; Murasaki; Okinawan purple; Stokes purple; Annan